Utah statutes.
31A-20-109.   Single risk limitation for title insurance.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Net retained liability" means the total potential liability retained by a title insurer for a single risk, after deducting liability reinsured for which credit may be taken under Section 31A-17-404.

(b)  "Single risk" means the sum of the potential liabilities under all title insurance policies issued on any estates in the same real property.

(2)  The net retained liability of a title insurer for a single risk, whether assumed directly or as reinsurance, may not exceed 50% of the capital and surplus of the insurer.

